Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB307.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and sections 1 and 5(b) of the act of November 24, 2004 (P.L.1270, No.153), referred to as the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System Law, are amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System and the Pennsylvania Purple Alert System; authorizing and directing the Pennsylvania State Police to establish and maintain the [Pennsylvania Amber Alert System] alert systems; assessing costs; and providing for immunity and penalties.Section 1. Pennsylvania Amber Alert System [and], Missing Endangered Person Advisory System (MEPAS) and 1234567891011121314151617181920 Pennsylvania Purple Alert System established.(a) Pennsylvania Amber Alert System.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System to assist in the recovery of abducted children through prompt notification to the general public, appropriate law enforcement authorities and other public agencies. (b) Missing Endangered Person Advisory System (MEPAS).--The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain the Missing Endangered Person Advisory System to assist in the recovery of missing persons who are at special risk of harm or injury, through prompt notification to the general public, appropriate law enforcement authorities and other agencies.( c) Pennsylvania Purple Alert System.-- (1) The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain the Pennsylvania Purple Alert System to notify the public of a missing person with an intellectual disability under paragraph (4).(2) The Pennsylvania Purple Alert System shall be operated by the Pennsylvania State Police. Activation may be requested by a law enforcement agency if the law enforcement agency determines that there is reason to believe:(i) the missing individual is at risk;(ii) the individual is missing due to the individual's physical or mental health condition; and(iii) there is sufficient information available to disseminate that could assist in locating the missing individual.(3) The notification under this subsection shall include a description of the missing person and other appropriate information.20250SB0307PN0244 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Intellectual disability." Regardless of the age of the individual, significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning of an individual that is accompanied by significant limitations in adaptive functioning in at least two of the following skill areas:(i) Communication.(ii) Self-care.(iii) Home living.(iv) Social and interpersonal.(v) Use of community resources.(vi) Self-direction.(vii) Functional academic.(viii) Work.(ix) Health and safety.Section 5. Immunity.* * *(b) Good Samaritan immunity.--Any person who provides, obtains or attempts to provide or obtain assistance for a child who is the subject of a Pennsylvania Amber Alert System notice [or], a person who is the subject of a Missing Endangered Person Advisory or a person who is the subject of a Pennsylvania Purple Alert System notice shall be immune from civil liability for acts or omissions in providing or obtaining or attempting to provide or obtain assistance except for acts or omissions intended to cause harm and for which the law does not recognize justification or that constitute gross negligence or willful, wanton or reckless conduct.20250SB0307PN0244 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0307PN0244 - 4 - 1